Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 7 SPECIFIC PROVISIONS
6-1-722. Gift certificates - validity - exemptions - definitions.

As used in this section, "gift card" means a prefunded tangible or electronic record of a specific monetary value evidencing an issuer's agreement to provide goods, services, credit, money, or anything of value. A "gift card" includes, but is not limited to, a tangible card; electronic card; stored-value card; or certificate or similar instrument, card, or tangible record, all of which contain a microprocessor chip, magnetic chip, or other means for the storage of information and for which the value is decremented upon each use. A "gift card" does not include a prefunded tangible or electronic record issued by, or on behalf of, any government agency; a gift certificate that is issued only on paper; a prepaid telecommunications or technology card; a card or certificate issued to a consumer pursuant to an awards, loyalty, or promotional program for which no money or other item of monetary value was exchanged; or a card that is donated or sold below face value at a volume discount to an employer or charitable organization for fundraising purposes.

This section shall not apply to gift cards that are usable with multiple sellers of goods or services. This exception shall not apply to a gift card usable only with affiliated sellers of goods or services.

On and after August 11, 2010, the issuer shall redeem the remaining value of a gift card for cash if the amount remaining is five dollars or less on request of the holder.

It is unlawful for any person or entity to sell to a purchaser a gift card that contains a service fee, a dormancy fee, an inactivity fee, a maintenance fee, or any other type of fee.

A violation of this section shall be deemed a deceptive trade practice as provided in section 6-1-105 (1)(ccc).

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-155), ch. 180, p. 647, § 1, effective August 11.

6-1-723. Cathinone bath salts - deceptive trade practice.

It is unlawful for any person or entity to distribute, dispense, manufacture, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sell to a purchaser any product that is labeled as a bath salt or any other trademark if the product contains any amount of any cathinones, as defined in section 18-18-102 (3.5), C.R.S.

A violation of this section shall be deemed a deceptive trade practice as provided in section 6-1-105 (1)(fff), and the violator shall be subject to a civil penalty as described in section 6-1-112 (1)(d) in addition to any applicable criminal penalty.

For the purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed to have committed a violation for each individually packaged product that he or she distributed, dispensed, manufactured, displayed for sale, offered for sale, attempted to sell, or sold in violation of subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1406, § 32, effective June 7.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1037), ch. 358, p. 1683, § 5, effective August 6.

6-1-724. Unlicensed alternative health-care practitioners - deceptive trade practices - short title - legislative declaration - definitions.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Natural Health Consumer Protection Act".

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

According to a July 2009 report from the national institute of health's national center for complementary and alternative medicine, which was based on 2007 survey data:

Thirty-eight percent of Americans use complementary and alternative medicine; and

Americans spent nearly thirty-four billion dollars in out-of-pocket costs in a twelve-month period for complementary and alternative medicine;

It is estimated that more than one million five hundred thousand Coloradans currently receive a substantial volume of health-care services from complementary and alternative health-care practitioners;

Those studies further indicate that individuals who use complementary and alternative health-care services represent a wide variety of age, ethnic, socioeconomic, and other demographic categories;

Although complementary and alternative health-care practitioners are not regulated by the state and are not required to obtain a state-issued license, certification, or registration, the provision of alternative health-care services in some circumstances may be interpreted as the provision of a health-care service that only a professional who is licensed or otherwise regulated by the state may perform, thereby subjecting complementary and alternative health-care practitioners to potential fines, penalties, and restrictions of their practices even though their practices do not pose an imminent and discernable risk of significant harm to public health and safety;

Because the state recognizes and values the freedom of consumers to choose their health-care providers, including the ability to choose a person who is not regulated by the state, the intent of this section is to protect consumer choice and, in consideration of the public's health and safety, to remove technical barriers to access to unregulated health-care practitioners and include appropriate consumer protections and disclosures as required in this section; and

Nothing in this section:

Requires a person engaged in complementary and alternative health care to obtain a license, certification, or registration from the state as long as the person practices within the parameters of this section;

Limits the public's right to access complementary and alternative health-care practitioners or the right of an unregulated complementary and alternative health-care practitioner to practice.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Complementary and alternative health-care practitioner" means a person who provides complementary and alternative health-care services in accordance with this section and who is not licensed, certified, or registered by the state as a health-care professional.

"Complementary and alternative health-care services" means advice and services:

Within the broad domain of health-care and healing arts therapies and methods that are based on complementary and alternative theories of health and wellness, including those that are traditional, cultural, religious, or integrative; and

That are not prohibited by subsection (6) of this section.

"Complementary and alternative health-care services" include:

Healing practices using food; food extracts; dietary supplements, as defined in the federal "Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994", Pub.L. 103-417; nutrients; homeopathic remedies and preparations; and the physical forces of heat, cold, water, touch, sound, and light;

Stress reduction healing practices; and

Mind-body and energetic healing practices.

"Health-care professional" means a person engaged in a health-care profession for which the state requires the person to obtain a license, certification, or registration under title 12, C.R.S., in order to engage in the health-care profession.

This section applies to any person who is not licensed, certified, or registered by the state as a health-care professional and who is practicing complementary and alternative health-care services.

A person who is not licensed, certified, or registered by the state as a health-care professional and who is practicing complementary and alternative health-care services consistent with this section does not violate any statute relating to a health-care profession or professional practice act unless the person:

Engages in an activity prohibited in subsection (6) of this section; or

Fails to fulfill the disclosure duties specified in subsection (7) of this section.

A complementary and alternative health-care practitioner who engages in an activity prohibited by subsection (6) of this section is subject to the enforcement provisions, civil penalties, and damages specified in part 1 of this article, is no longer exempt from laws regulating the practice of health-care professionals under title 12, C.R.S., and may be subject to penalties for unauthorized practice of a state-regulated health-care profession.

A person who fails to comply with subsection (7) of this section is subject to the enforcement provisions, civil penalties, and damages specified in part 1 of this article.

A complementary and alternative health-care practitioner providing complementary and alternative health-care services under this section who is not licensed, certified, or registered by the state shall not:

Perform surgery or any invasive procedure, including a procedure that requires entry into the body through skin, puncture, mucosa, incision, or other intrusive method, except as permitted under paragraph (g) of this subsection (6);

Administer or prescribe X ray radiation to another person;

Prescribe, administer, inject, dispense, suggest, or recommend a prescription or legend drug or a controlled substance or device identified in the federal "Controlled Substances Act", 21 U.S.C. sec. 801 et seq., as amended;

Use general or spinal anesthetics, other than topical anesthetics;

Administer ionizing radioactive substances for therapeutic purposes;

Use a laser device that punctures the skin, incises the body, or is otherwise used as an invasive instrument. If a complementary and alternative health-care practitioner uses a laser device as a noninvasive instrument, the laser device must be cleared by the federal food and drug administration for over-the-counter use.

Perform enemas or colonic irrigation unless the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner:

Maintains board certification through the international association of colon hydrotherapy or the national board for colon hydrotherapy or their successor entities;

Discloses that he or she is not a physician licensed pursuant to article 240 of title 12; and

Recommends that the client have a relationship with a licensed physician;

Practice midwifery;

Practice psychotherapy, as defined in section 12-245-202 (14);

Perform spinal adjustment, manipulation, or mobilization;

Provide optometric procedures or interventions that constitute the practice of optometry, as defined in article 275 of title 12;

Directly administer medical protocols to a pregnant woman or to a client who has cancer;

Treat a child who is under two years of age;

Treat a child who is two years of age or older but less than eight years of age unless the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner:

Obtains the written, signed consent of the child's parent or legal guardian;

Discloses that he or she is not a physician licensed pursuant to article 240 of title 12;

Recommends that the child have a relationship with a licensed pediatric health-care provider; and

Requests permission from the parent or legal guardian for the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner to attempt to develop and maintain a collaborative relationship with the child's licensed pediatric health-care provider, if the child has a relationship with a licensed pediatric health-care provider;

Provide dental procedures or interventions that constitute the practice of dentistry, as defined in article 220 of title 12;

Set fractures;

Practice or represent that he or she is practicing massage or massage therapy as defined in article 235 of title 12;

Provide a conventional medical disease diagnosis to a client;

Recommend the discontinuation of a course of care, including a prescription drug, that was recommended or prescribed by a health-care professional; or

Hold oneself out as, state, indicate, advertise, or imply to a client or prospective client that he or she is a physician, surgeon, or both, or that he or she is a health-care professional who is licensed, certified, or registered by the state.

Any person providing complementary and alternative health-care services in this state who is not licensed, certified, or registered by the state as a health-care professional is not regulated by a professional board or the division of professions and occupations in the department of regulatory agencies pursuant to title 12, C.R.S., and is advertising or charging a fee for health-care services shall provide to each client during the initial client contact the following information in a plainly worded written statement:

The complementary and alternative health-care practitioner's name, business address, telephone number, and any other contact information for the practitioner;

The fact that the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner is not licensed, certified, or registered by the state as a health-care professional;

The nature of the complementary and alternative health-care services to be provided;

A listing of any degrees, training, experience, credentials, or other qualifications the person holds regarding the complementary and alternative health-care services he or she provides;

A statement that the client should discuss any recommendations made by the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner with the client's primary care physician, obstetrician, gynecologist, oncologist, cardiologist, pediatrician, or other board-certified physician; and

A statement indicating whether or not the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner is covered by liability insurance applicable to any injury caused by an act or omission of the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner in providing complementary and alternative health-care services pursuant to this section.

Before a complementary and alternative health-care practitioner provides complementary and alternative health-care services for the first time to a client, the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner shall obtain a written, signed acknowledgment from the client stating that the client has received the information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (7). The complementary and alternative health-care practitioner shall give a copy of the acknowledgment to the client and shall retain the original or a copy of the acknowledgment for at least two years after the last date of service.

A complementary and alternative health-care practitioner shall not represent in any advertisement for complementary and alternative health-care services that the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner is licensed, certified, or registered by the state as a health-care professional.

The following persons shall not provide complementary and alternative health-care services pursuant to this section:

A health-care professional whose state-issued license, certification, or registration has been revoked or suspended by the state and has not been reinstated;

A person who has been convicted of a felony for a crime against a person or a felony related to health care and who has not satisfied the terms of the sentence imposed for the crime. As used in this paragraph (b), "convicted" includes entering a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or the imposition of a deferred sentence.

A person who has been deemed mentally incompetent by a court of law.

A complementary and alternative health-care practitioner who renders complementary and alternative health-care services consistent with this section is not engaging in the practice of medicine, as defined in article 240 of title 12, and is not violating the "Colorado Medical Practice Act", article 240 of title 12, as long as the complementary and alternative health-care practitioner does not engage in an act prohibited in subsection (6) of this section.

Nothing otherwise authorizes a complementary and alternative health-care practitioner practicing within the scope of practice in this section to engage in the practice of medicine.

This section does not apply to or prohibit:

Any licensed, certified, or registered health-care professional from practicing his or her regulated profession;

The practice of health-care services that are exempt from state regulation or the provision of health-care services by a person who is exempt from state regulation; or

A person from selling dietary supplements as stipulated under the federal "Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994", Pub.L. 103-417, or other natural health-care products or advising, educating, or counseling about the structure and function of the human body and the use of natural health-care products to support health and wellness.

This section does not limit the right of any person to seek relief under this article or any other available civil or common law remedy for damages resulting from the negligence of a person providing complementary and alternative health-care services.

Nothing in this section relieves a licensed, certified, or registered health-care professional from liability arising from any injury caused by the health-care professional in the course of providing complementary or alternative health-care services.

Nothing in this section prevents a consumer from obtaining nutritional information from a nutritionist employed by or under contract with a health food store or wellness center or the nutritionist from providing nutritional information to the consumer.

A violation of this section constitutes a deceptive trade practice under this article.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-215), ch. 399, p. 2328, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2016:

(6)(q) amended, (HB 16-1320), ch. 265, p. 1101, § 9, effective June 8.

L. 2019:

(6)(g)(II), (6)(i), (6)(k), (6)(n)(II), (6)(o), (6)(q), and (9)(a) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1644, § 12, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 16-1320, see section 1 of chapter 265, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

6-1-725. Synthetic cannabinoids - incense - deceptive trade practice.

It is unlawful for any person or entity to distribute, dispense, manufacture, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sell to a purchaser any product that contains any amount of any synthetic cannabinoid, as defined in section 18-18-102 (34.5), C.R.S.

A violation of this section is a deceptive trade practice as provided in section 6-1-105 (1)(ggg), and the violator shall be subject to a civil penalty as described in section 6-1-112 (1)(e) in addition to any applicable criminal penalty.

For the purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed to have committed a violation for each individually packaged product that he or she distributed, dispensed, manufactured, displayed for sale, offered for sale, attempted to sell, or sold in violation of subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1037), ch. 358, p. 1681, § 1, effective August 6.

6-1-726. Sale of public services - deceptive trade practice - definition.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person does any of the following with respect to a government service or an appointment to receive a government service and if a government entity makes the service or appointment publicly available without charge:

The person reserves or obtains the service or appointment, and the person sells the service or appointment;

The person reserves or obtains, with the intent to sell, the service or appointment;

The person reserves or obtains the service or appointment, and the person appends the service or appointment to another good or service the person offers for sale; or

The person falsely represents to the potential customer that the person has obtained or secured the service or appointment, and the person attempts to sell the service or appointment.

This section does not apply when the person:

Has consent from the government entity to sell the specific service or appointment obtained or reserved; or

Is obtaining and selling or offering to sell only information.

As used in this section, "government entity" means the state of Colorado, a political subdivision of Colorado, or an agency of either the state of Colorado or a political subdivision of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1335), ch. 246, p. 1015, § 3, effective July 1.

6-1-727. Immigration-related services provided by nonattorneys - deceptive trade practice - definitions.

Legislative declaration. The general assembly hereby finds and determines that the practice by some nonattorneys of providing legal advice or services in immigration matters negatively impacts the people who use their services and the public interest in preventing fraud and providing adequate opportunities to pursue immigration relief. While the Colorado supreme court regulates the practice of law in this state, the general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is in the public interest to prohibit nonattorneys from engaging in deceptive trade practices in immigration services in addition to the Colorado supreme court's prohibition against the unauthorized practice of law.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Compensation" means money, property, or anything else of value.

"Immigration matter" means a proceeding, filing, or other action that affects a person's immigrant, nonimmigrant, or citizenship status that arises under an immigration and naturalization law, executive order, or presidential proclamation or pursuant to an action of the United States citizenship and immigration services, the United States immigration and customs enforcement, the United States department of labor, the United States department of state, the United States department of justice, the United States department of homeland security, the board of immigration appeals, or their successor agencies, or any other entity having jurisdiction over immigration law.

"Immigration matter" includes a pending or future act of congress or executive order that concerns immigration reform.

"Practice of law" has the meaning established by the Colorado supreme court, whether by rule or decision.

Prohibited practices - assistance with immigration matters - permitted practices.

A person shall not engage in the practice of law in an immigration matter for compensation unless the person is:

Licensed or otherwise authorized to practice law in this state pursuant to Colorado supreme court rules and article 93 of title 13; or

Authorized, under federal law, whether acting through a charitable organization or otherwise, to represent others in immigration matters.

If a person other than a person listed in subparagraph (I) or (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) engages in or offers to engage in one or more of the following acts or practices in an immigration matter for compensation, the person engages in a deceptive trade practice:

Advising or assisting another person in a determination of the person's legal or illegal status for the purpose of an immigration matter;

For the purpose of applying for a benefit, visa, or program related to an immigration matter, selecting for another person, assisting another person in selecting, or advising another person in selecting a benefit, visa, or program;

Selecting for another person, assisting another person in selecting, or advising another person in selecting his or her answers on a government agency form or document related to an immigration matter;

Preparing documents for, or otherwise representing the interests of, another person in a judicial or administrative proceeding in an immigration matter;

Explaining, advising, or otherwise interpreting the meaning or intent of a question on a government agency form in an immigration matter;

Demanding or accepting advance payment for the future performance of services in an immigration matter, especially with regard to services to be performed if a pending or future act of congress or executive order that concerns immigration reform is made effective; or

Selecting, drafting, or completing a legal document affecting the legal rights of another person in an immigration matter.

With or without compensation or the expectation of compensation, a person other than a person listed in subparagraph (I) or (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) engages in a deceptive trade practice in an immigration matter if he or she represents, in any language, either orally or in a document, letterhead, advertisement, stationery, business card, website, or other written material that he or she:

Is a notario publico, notario, immigration assistant, immigration consultant, immigration specialist, or other designation or title that conveys or implies in any language that he or she possesses professional legal skills or expertise in the area of immigration law; or

Can or is willing to provide services in an immigration matter, if such services would constitute the practice of law.

The prohibitions of subsection (3)(a) to (3)(c) of this section do not apply to the activities of a nonattorney assistant acting under the supervision of a person who is:

Licensed or otherwise authorized to practice law in this state pursuant to Colorado supreme court rules and article 93 of title 13; or

Authorized, under federal law, to represent others in immigration matters.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection (3), a person other than a person listed in subparagraph (I) or (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) may:

Offer or provide language translation or typing services, regardless of whether compensation is sought;

Secure or offer to secure existing documents, such as birth and marriage certificates, for a person seeking services; or

Offer other immigration-related services that:

Are not prohibited under this subsection (3), section 24-21-523 (1)(f) or (1)(i) or 24-21-525 (3), (4), or (5), or any other provision of law; and

Do not constitute the practice of law.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1391), ch. 354, p. 1453, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(3)(a)(I), IP(3)(d), and (3)(d)(I) amended, (SB 17-227), ch. 192, p. 704, § 3, effective August 9; (3)(e)(III)(A) amended, (SB 17-132), ch. 207, p. 808, § 5, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor's note:

Section 8(1) of Senate Bill 17-132 was amended by section 121 of Senate Bill 17-294 to change the effective date of Senate Bill 17-132 from August 9, 2017, to July 1, 2018.

6-1-728. Solicitation of fee for a deed or deed of trust - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Local government" means a political subdivision of this state, a special purpose district in this state, an instrumentality or corporation of such a political subdivision or special purpose district, or a combination or subunit of any of them.

"Solicit" or "solicitation" means to directly advertise or market through writing or graphics and via mail, telefax, or electronic mail to an individually identified person, residence, or business location. "Solicit" and "solicitation" do not include any of the following:

Communicating via telephone, mail, or electronic communication, if initiated by a consumer; or

Advertising and marketing to those with whom the solicitor has a preexisting business relationship.

"State agency" means any office, department, or independent agency in the executive branch of Colorado state government, the general assembly, or the courts.

A person who solicits a fee for providing a copy of a deed or deed of trust shall:

Not less than fifteen days before distributing a solicitation, furnish a copy of the document that will be used for the solicitation to each county clerk and recorder where the solicitation is to be distributed;

Not charge a fee of more than four times the amount charged by the county clerk and recorder that has custody of the deed or deed of trust for a copy of the same deed or deed of trust; and

State on the top of the document used for the solicitation, in at least twenty-four-point type:

That the solicitation is not from a state agency or local government;

That no action is legally required of the person being solicited;

The fee for, or the cost of, obtaining a copy of the deed or deed of trust from the county clerk and recorder that has custody of the deed or deed of trust;

The information necessary to contact the county clerk and recorder that has custody of the deed or deed of trust; and

The name and physical address of the person soliciting the fee.

The document used for a solicitation must not be in a form or use deadline dates or other language that makes the document appear to be a document issued by a state agency or local government or that appears to impose a legal duty on the individual being solicited.

Only the attorney general or district attorney may bring an action against a person who violates this section. The penalties specified in section 6-1-112 apply to the action.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1154), ch. 136, p. 892, § 1, effective August 8.

6-1-729. Assisted living residence referral - disclosures - penalty - fine - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Assisted living residence" means a residential facility that makes available to three or more adults not related to the owner of the facility, either directly or indirectly through an agreement with a resident, room and board and at least the following services: Personal services; protective oversight; social care due to impaired capacity to live independently; and regular supervision that is available on a twenty-four-hour basis.

"Assisted living residence" includes a facility operated for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, a long-term care facility, and any other facility of a similar nature.

"Referral agency" means an individual or entity that provides referrals to an assisted living residence for a fee that is collected from either the prospective resident or the assisted living residence. "Referral agency" does not include an assisted living residence or its employees; a resident's family member; or a resident of an assisted living residence, regardless of whether the resident who refers a prospective resident to an assisted living residence receives a discount or other remuneration from the assisted living residence.

A referral agency shall disclose to a prospective resident or the representative of the prospective resident referred to an assisted living residence:

Documentation of the existence of any relationships between the referral agency and the assisted living residence, including common ownership or control of the assisted living residence, and financial, business, management, or familial relationships between the referral agency and the assisted living residence;

That the referral agency receives a fee from the assisted living residence for the referral; and

Written documentation of the agreement between the referral agency and the prospective resident or representative of the prospective resident. The agreement must include:

The right of the prospective resident or representative of the prospective resident to terminate the referral agency's services for any reason at any time; and

A requirement that the referral agency communicate the cancellation of the agreement to all assisted living residences to which the prospective resident has been referred.

The referral agency and the prospective resident or representative of the prospective resident shall sign and date the documentation required in subsection (2) of this section. The referral agency shall provide a written or electronic copy of the signed disclosure to the assisted living residence on or before the date the resident is admitted to the assisted living residence.

The assisted living residence shall:

Not pay the referral agency a fee:

Until written receipt of the documentation required in subsection (2) of this section; and

On or after the date the agreement between the referral agency and the prospective client or representative of the prospective client is terminated;

Maintain a written or electronic copy of the documentation required in subsection (2) of this section at the assisted living residence for at least one year after the date that the new resident is admitted; and

Not sell or transfer the prospective resident's or prospective resident's representative's contact information to a third party without the written consent of the prospective resident or representative of the prospective resident.

A referral agency that violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars per violation.

The attorney general or a district attorney may bring a civil action on behalf of the state to seek the imposition of civil penalty for a violation of this section or to enjoin the continuance of the violation by the referral agency.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1268), ch. 167, p. 1967, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1)(a), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 20-1101), ch. 54, p. 186, § 1, effective September 14.

6-1-730. Price gouging during declared disaster prohibited - deceptive trade practice - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby:

Finds and determines that:

Under ordinary conditions, the pricing of consumer goods and services generally is best left to the marketplace; except that, when a declared disaster results in abnormal disruptions of the market, the public interest requires that any unfair and unconscionable increase in the price of consumer goods or services be discouraged; and

Protecting consumers from price gouging is a vital function of the state's interest in providing for the health, safety, and welfare of the public; and

Declares that existing prohibitions on deceptive or unfair and unconscionable trade practices under this article 1 should be clarified to ensure that price gouging has been and remains a violation of this article 1.

A person engages in an unfair and unconscionable act or practice when, during a disaster period and within the designated area, the person charges a price so excessive as to amount to price gouging in:

The sale or offer for sale of:

Building materials;

Consumer food items;

Emergency supplies;

Fuel;

Medical supplies; or

Other necessities; or

The provision of or offer to provide:

Repair or reconstruction services;

Transportation, freight, or storage services; or

Services used in an emergency cleanup.

A price shall not be considered unreasonably excessive if the seller can prove that, due to the events that gave rise to the disaster declaration, the price charged by the seller is directly attributable to additional costs imposed by the seller's supplier or suppliers or other direct costs of providing the good or service sold or offered for sale by the seller.

This section is enforceable solely by, and at the discretion of, the attorney general or the district attorney with jurisdiction over the conduct at issue.

As used in this section:

"Building materials" means lumber, construction tools, windows, and other materials used in the repair or reconstruction of a structure or other property.

"Consumer food item" means an article used or intended for use as food, beverage, confection, or condiment for human or animal consumption.

"Designated area" means the specific geographic area identified in a disaster declaration.

"Disaster" has the meaning set forth in section 24-33.5-703 (3).

"Disaster declaration" means the declaration of:

A national emergency by the president of the United States pursuant to the "National Emergencies Act", 50 U.S.C. sec. 1601 et seq., as amended; or

A disaster emergency by the governor pursuant to section 24-33.5-704 (4).

"Disaster period" means the date a disaster declaration begins and continuing for one hundred eighty days after the date the disaster declaration begins.

"Emergency supplies" includes water, ice, flashlights, radios, batteries, candles, blankets, soap, diapers, temporary shelters, tape, toilet paper, tissues, paper towels, and toiletries.

"Fuel" means any liquid or gas used to power a vehicle or power tool or used to heat and power a building.

"Fuel" includes gasoline, diesel fuel, and methyl alcohol.

"Medical device" has the same meaning as "device" as set forth in section 25-5-402 (8).

"Medical supplies" includes prescription and nonprescription medication, medical devices, bandages, gauze, isopropyl alcohol, and antibacterial products.

"Necessities" means goods and services that are necessary for human or animal survival during a disaster period.

"Repair or reconstruction services" means services performed to repair or reconstruct any type of vehicle; residential, commercial, agricultural, or government-owned property; or any property owned by an educational institution, that is damaged as a result of a disaster.

"Transportation, freight, or storage services" means a service that is performed by a person that:

Contracts to move, transport, or store property; or

Rents equipment for the purpose of moving, transporting, or storing property.

"Transportation, freight, or storage services" includes towing services.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1414), ch. 305, p. 1552, § 1, effective July 14.